West Virginia, session 2026, HB4608.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13. THE SCHOOL BOARD ELECTION DATE ACT. §3-13-1. Date of school board elections. (a) The date of a school district's election for members of its board of education shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, simultaneously with the general election.(b) Replacement of school board members who resign or die shall be according to §18-5-2 of this code. §3-13-2. Alphabetical listing of school board candidates. For the election of school board members, the names of all filed candidates shall be listed alphabetically. §3-13-3. Severability. If any provision of this chapter, or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance, is held to be invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of its provisions to any other person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.